bng.dix
		<pardef n="kAkI_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>kei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>keo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAkei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAkeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tikei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tikeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>rA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xera</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>sakala</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerake</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xera</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerakei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerakeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
	
		</pardef>


  	<section id="main" type="standard">
	<!-- nouns -->
		<e lm="Ama"><i>Ama</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aparAXa"><i>aparAX</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="afka"><i>afk</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aBimAna"><i>aBimAn</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="coKa"><i>coK</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="budZo Afgul"><i>budZo<b/>Afgul</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AMti"><i>AMti</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Afgura"><i>Afgur</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="gAmaCA"><i>gAmaCA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="dima"><i>dim</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pArWakya"><i>pArWaky</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="anXakAra"><i>anXakAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="anyAyZa"><i>anyAyZ</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aMSa"><i>aMS</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="cila"><i>cil</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="buxXi"><i>buxXi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Kabara kAgaja"><i>Kabara<b/>kAgaj</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AGAwa"><i>AGAw</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ATa AnA"><i>ATa<b/>anA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Alu"><i>Alu</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AxA"><i>AxA</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aXikArI"><i>aXikArI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aXyakRa"><i>aXyakR</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aXyayZana"><i>aXyayZan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aXyApaka"><i>aXyApak</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Sasya"><i>Sasy</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="dAlima"><i>dAlim</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="apakAra"><i>apakAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="apaharaNa"><i>apaharaN</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="apsarA"><i>apsarA</i><par n="aXyApikA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="gujaba"><i>gujab</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AXikArika"><i>AXikArik</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aBinanxana"><i>aBinanxan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="peyZArA"><i>peyZArA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kAmanA"><i>kAmanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="xaraKAswa"><i>xaraKAsw</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sajjA"><i>sajjA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AlamAri"><i>AlamAri</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="abahelA"><i>abahelA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ekAgrawA"><i>ekAgrawA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="suyoga"><i>suyog</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="abasWA"><i>abasWA</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="praBAba"><i>praBAb</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hAsapAwAla"><i>hAsapAwAl</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ahaMkAra"><i>ahaMkAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="apakAra"><i>apakAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AxAlawa"><i>AxAlaw</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aBijFawA"><i>aBijFawA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="asawya"><i>asawy</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="anuBaba"><i>anuBab</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aparAXI"><i>aparAXI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kRawi"><i>kRawi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Amalaki"><i>Amalaki</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aSru"><i>aSru</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Aina"><i>Ain</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AyZanA"><i>AyZanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ASA"><i>ASA</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AkASa"><i>AkAS</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Aguna"><i>Agun</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Agraha"><i>Agrah</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AxeSa"><i>AxeS</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AwmahawyA"><i>AwmahawyA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aByAsa"><i>aByAs</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Axara"><i>Axar</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AyZojana"><i>AyZojan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AxeSa"><i>AxeS</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="iFjiniyara"><i>iFjiniyZAr</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rAmaXanu"><i>rAmaXanu</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="nyAya"><i>nyAyZ</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="svIkArokwi"><i>svIkArokwi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="icCA"><i>icCA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="anumawi"><i>anumawi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="iwihAsa"><i>iwihAs</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="milayukwa"><i>milayukw</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="puraskAra"><i>puraskAr</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="prawyAKyAna"><i>prawyAKyAn</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="nyAya"><i>nyAyZ</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="weMtula"><i>wezwul</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Babana"><i>Baban</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="cikitsA"><i>cikisA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="elAca"><i>elAc</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="saMkewa"><i>saMkew</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="iMta"><i>iMt</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Ixa"><i>Ix</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="KqRtAbxa"><i>KqRtAbx</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Afula"><i>Aful</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ujjvalawA"><i>ujjvalawA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="uwwApa"><i>uwwAp</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Silpa"><i>Silp</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="XAra"><i>XAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="utpAxana"><i>upAxan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bayasa"><i>bayZas</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="prArWI"><i>prArWI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="urxu"><i>urxu</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="peMcA"><i>pezcA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="agragawi"><i>agragawi</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="uwwara"><i>uwwar</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="uccawA"><i>uccawA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="gaNdagola"><i>ganxagol</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="Ekya"><i>Eky</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="upakAra"><i>upakAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="SiSira"><i>SiSir</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mahilA"><i>mahilA</i><par n="aXyApikA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kaxama"><i>kaxam</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kApaRa"><i>kApaR</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kqRNa"><i>kqRN</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pAyarA"><i>pAyZarA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kabara"><i>kabar</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kabarasWAna"><i>kabarasWAn</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="piTa"><i>piT</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kakRa"><i>kakR</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="jAmA"><i>jAmA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kAja"><i>kAj</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="XAraka"><i>XArak</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kalama"><i>kalam</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kabiwA"><i>kabiwA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="hqxayZa"><i>hqxayZ</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="SapaWa"><i>SapaW</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="xoRa"><i>xoR</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="xoRI"><i>xoRI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kAgaja"><i>kAgaj</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kAna"><i>kAn</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="KAwA"><i>KAwA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aPisa"><i>aPis</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="marica"><i>maric</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="bai"><i>bai</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="prAnwa"><i>prAnw</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="BArA"><i>BArA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kqRaka"><i>kqRak</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="prakAra"><i>prakAr</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="BAgya"><i>BAgy</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="karxama"><i>karxam</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="pokA"><i>pokA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="xAma"><i>xAm</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kukura"><i>kukur</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="prakqwi"><i>prakqwi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="balixAna"><i>balixAn</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kuTAra"><i>kuTAr</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kAzci"><i>kAzci</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="banxI"><i>banxI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kakRa"><i>kakR</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="ceRtA"><i>ceRtA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kahinura"><i>kahinur</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kAka"><i>kAk</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kabi"><i>kabi</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="galpa"><i>galp</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>			
		<e lm="kaRta"><i>kaRt</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="bali"><i>bali</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="bipawwi"><i>bipawwi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="Kabara"><i>Kabar</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="wvaka"><i>wvak</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="KewAba"><i>KewAb</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="KeludZe"><i>KeludZe</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="KelanA"><i>KelanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="Ananxa"><i>Ananx</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="hawyAkArI"><i>hawyAkArI</i><par n="aXikArI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="sOnxarya"><i>sOnxary</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>	
		<e lm="KAmAra"><i>KAmAr</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kqRi"><i>kqRi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="AKa"><i>AK</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="gafgA"><i>gafgA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="gajala"><i>gajal</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="gAna"><i>gAn</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="SiyZAla"><i>SiyZAla</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="golApa"><i>golAp</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="holi"><i>holi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="rAga"><i>rAg</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="gAzxA"><i>gAzxA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="gama"><i>gam</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="gAdZI"><i>gAdZI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="GatanA"><i>GatanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="GadZi"><i>GadZi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="GAsa"><i>GAs</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="nIdZa"><i>nIdZ</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="GatanA"><i>GatanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="bAri"><i>bAri</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>			
		<e lm="kAkA"><i>kAkA</i><par n="kAkA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="kAkI"><i>kAkI</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="cAzxA"><i>cAzxA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="AlocanA"><i>AlocanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="rUpA"><i>rUpA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="cAbi"><i>cAbi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="cA"><i>cA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>		
		<e lm="cAla"><i>cAl</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
